Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-447
License; denied or refused renewal; grounds.

The department may deny or refuse to renew a license under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act to any health care facility or health care service that fails to meet the requirements for licensure provided in the act or in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act, including (1) failing an inspection pursuant to section 71-440, (2) failing to meet a compliance assessment standard adopted under section 71-442, (3) having had a license revoked within the two-year period preceding application, or (4) any of the grounds listed in section 71-448.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 47.